California, session 20252026, AB1116.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2196 of the Elections Code is amended to read:2196. (a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, a person who is qualified to register to vote and who has a valid California driver’s license or state identification card may submit an affidavit of voter registration electronically on the Secretary of State’s internet website.(2) An affidavit submitted pursuant to this section is effective upon receipt of the affidavit by the Secretary of State if the affidavit is received on or before the last day to register for an election to be held in the precinct of the person submitting the affidavit.(3) The affiant shall affirmatively attest to the truth of the information provided in the affidavit.(4) The affidavit shall contain, before or at the time that the applicant affirmatively assents to the use of the applicant’s signature pursuant to paragraph (5), a statement that the county elections official shall compare the affiant’s signature appearing on an identification envelope for the return of a vote by mail ballot cast in a future election with the signatures appearing in the voter’s registration record, including the signature appearing on the applicant’s driver’s license or state identification card.(5) For voter registration purposes, the applicant shall affirmatively assent to the use of the applicant’s signature from the applicant’s driver’s license or state identification card.(6) For each electronic affidavit, the Secretary of State shall obtain an electronic copy of the applicant’s signature from the applicant’s driver’s license or state identification card directly from the Department of Motor Vehicles.(7) The Secretary of State shall require a person who submits an affidavit pursuant to this section to submit all of the following:(A) The number from the person’s California driver’s license or state identification card.(B) The person’s date of birth.(C) The last four digits of the person’s social security number.(D) Any other information the Secretary of State deems necessary to establish the identity of the affiant.(8) Upon submission of an affidavit pursuant to this section, the electronic voter registration system shall provide for immediate verification of both of the following:(A) That the applicant has a California driver’s license or state identification card and that the number for that driver’s license or identification card provided by the applicant matches the number for that person’s driver’s license or identification card that is on file with the Department of Motor Vehicles.(B) That the date of birth provided by the applicant matches the date of birth for that person that is on file with the Department of Motor Vehicles.(9) The Secretary of State shall employ security measures to ensure the accuracy and integrity of affidavits of voter registration submitted electronically pursuant to this section.(b) The Department of Motor Vehicles shall use the electronic voter registration system required by this section to comply with its duties and responsibilities as a voter registration agency pursuant to the federal National Voter Registration Act of 1993 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20501 et seq.).(c) The Department of Motor Vehicles and the Secretary of State shall maintain a process and the infrastructure to allow the electronic copy of the applicant’s signature and other information required under this section that is in the possession of the department to be transferred to the Secretary of State and to the county election management systems to allow a person who is qualified to register to vote in California to register to vote under this section.(d) If an applicant cannot electronically submit the information required pursuant to paragraph (7) of subdivision (a), the applicant shall nevertheless be able to complete the affidavit of voter registration electronically on the Secretary of State’s internet website, print a hard copy of the completed affidavit, and mail or deliver the hard copy of the completed affidavit to the Secretary of State or the appropriate county elections official.(e) This section shall remain in effect until the earlier of the following dates, September 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed: repealed.(1)January 1, 2027.(2)Five days after the date on which the Secretary of State certifies that information technology infrastructure necessary to update its electronic voter registration system to meet both of the following requirements is functional:(A)The electronic voter registration system shall authorize a person who has a social security number and is qualified to register to vote, but who does not have a California driver’s license or state identification card, to submit an affidavit of voter registration electronically on the Secretary of State’s internet website.(B)The electronic voter registration system shall require a person who submits an affidavit of voter registration pursuant to subparagraph (A) to provide the last four digits of the person’s social security number and to electronically upload a high-quality image of the person’s signature.SEC. 2. Section 2196 is added to the Elections Code, to read:2196. (a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, a person who is qualified to register to vote may submit an affidavit of voter registration electronically on the Secretary of State’s internet website pursuant to this section.(2) An affidavit submitted pursuant to this section is effective upon receipt of the affidavit by the Secretary of State if the affidavit is received on or before the last day to register for an election to be held in the precinct of the person submitting the affidavit.(3) The affiant shall affirmatively attest to the truth of the information provided in the affidavit.(4) The affidavit shall contain, before or at the time that the applicant affirmatively assents to the use of the applicant’s signature pursuant to paragraph (5), a statement that the county elections official shall compare the affiant’s signature appearing on an identification envelope for the return of a vote by mail ballot cast in a future election with the signatures appearing in the voter’s registration record, including the signature appearing on the applicant’s driver’s license or state identification card or any electronic image of the applicant’s signature uploaded by the applicant collected pursuant to paragraph (10).(5) For voter registration purposes, the applicant shall affirmatively assent to the use of the applicant’s signature from the applicant’s driver’s license or state identification card or the electronic image of the applicant’s signature uploaded by the applicant collected pursuant to paragraph (10).(6) For each electronic affidavit, the Secretary of State shall obtain an electronic copy of the applicant’s signature from the applicant’s driver’s license or state identification card directly from the Department of Motor Vehicles, or for applicants not providing a California driver’s license or state identification number pursuant to paragraph (7), an electronic image of the applicant’s signature uploaded by the applicant collected pursuant to paragraph (10).(7) The Secretary of State shall require a person who submits an affidavit pursuant to this section to submit all of the following:(A) If a person has been issued a California driver’s license or state identification card, the number from the person’s California driver’s license or state identification card.(B) The person’s date of birth.(C) The last four digits of the person’s social security number.(D) Any other information the Secretary of State deems necessary to establish the identity of the affiant.(8) Upon submission of an affidavit providing a California driver’s license or state identification number pursuant to this section, the electronic voter registration system shall provide for immediate verification of both of the following:(A) That the applicant has a California driver’s license or state identification card and that the number for that driver’s license or identification card provided by the applicant matches the number for that person’s driver’s license or identification card that is on file with the Department of Motor Vehicles.(B) That the date of birth provided by the applicant matches the date of birth for that person that is on file with the Department of Motor Vehicles.(9) Upon submission of an affidavit pursuant to this section not providing a California driver’s license or state identification number, but providing the last four digits of the applicant’s social security number, the electronic voter registration system shall authenticate the identity of the applicant under a process developed by the Secretary of State that verifies all of the following information using information maintained by the Secretary of State or the federal Social Security Administration:(A) The last four digits of the applicant’s social security number.(B) The applicant’s full name.(C) The applicant’s date of birth.(10) The Secretary of State shall develop a process method to collect an electronic image of a signature for an applicant under paragraph (9) to electronically upload a high-quality digitized image of the applicant’s signature through the electronic voter registration system, (9), as well as a process for transmitting the digitized image of that applicant’s signature to the statewide voter registration database and the county election management systems to allow a person who is qualified to register to vote in California to register to vote under this section. The electronic upload process method described in this paragraph shall be accessible to people with disabilities.(11) The Secretary of State shall employ security measures to ensure the accuracy and integrity of affidavits of voter registration submitted electronically pursuant to this section.(b) The Department of Motor Vehicles shall use the electronic voter registration system required by this section to comply with its duties and responsibilities as a voter registration agency pursuant to the federal National Voter Registration Act of 1993 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20501 et seq.).(c) The Department of Motor Vehicles and the Secretary of State shall maintain a process and the infrastructure to allow the electronic copy of the applicant’s signature and other information required under this section that is in the possession of the department to be transferred to the Secretary of State and to the county election management systems to allow a person who is qualified to register to vote in California to register to vote under this section.(d) If an applicant cannot electronically submit the information required pursuant to paragraph (7) of subdivision (a), or if an applicant under paragraph (9) of subdivision (a) is unable to upload provide an electronic image of the applicant’s signature pursuant to paragraph (10) of subdivision (a), the applicant shall nevertheless be able to complete the affidavit of voter registration electronically on the Secretary of State’s internet website, print a hard copy of the completed affidavit, and mail or deliver the hard copy of the completed affidavit to the Secretary of State or the appropriate county elections official.(e) This section shall become operative on the earlier of the following dates: September 1, 2027.(1)January 1, 2027.(2)Five days after the date on which the Secretary of State certifies that information technology infrastructure necessary to update its electronic voter registration system to meet both of the following requirements, as described in this section, is functional:(A)The electronic voter registration system shall authorize a person who has a social security number and is qualified to register to vote, but who does not have a California driver’s license or state identification card, to submit an affidavit of voter registration electronically on the Secretary of State’s internet website.(B)The electronic voter registration system shall require a person who submits an affidavit of voter registration pursuant to subparagraph (A) to provide the last four digits of the person’s social security number and to electronically upload a high-quality image of the person’s signature.